Louisiana, session 2026, HB915.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:460.74 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§460.74. Prior authorization Utilization management; time periods; criteria; notice
to providers
A. A managed care organization shall maintain written procedures for
making utilization review determinations and for notifying enrollees and providers
acting on behalf of enrollees of its determination and shall make a utilization review
determination as expeditiously as the enrollee's health condition requires, but in all
cases no later than the time periods set forth in this Section.
A. B. The prior authorization requirements of the department and each
managed care organization, including prior authorization requirements applicable in
the Medicaid pharmacy program, shall either be furnished to the healthcare provider
within twenty-four hours of a request for the requirements or posted in an easily
searchable format on the website of the respective managed care organization or the
department. Information posted in accordance with the requirements of this Section
shall include the date of last review.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 915 ENROLLED
B. C. If the department or a managed care organization denies a prior
authorization request, then the department or managed care organization shall
provide written notice of the denial to the provider requesting the prior authorization
within three two business days of making the decision. If the denial of the prior
authorization by the department or managed care organization is based upon an
interpretation of a law, regulation, policy, procedure, or medical criteria or guideline,
then the notice shall contain either instructions for accessing the applicable law,
regulation, policy, procedure, or medical criteria or guideline in the public domain
or an actual copy of that law, regulation, policy, procedure, or medical criteria or
guideline.
D.(1) A managed care organization shall make all standard service
authorization determinations within seven calendar days of obtaining appropriate
clinical documentation that may be required regarding a proposed procedure or
service requiring a review determination with the following exceptions:
(a) A managed care organization shall make all inpatient hospital service
authorizations within two calendar days of obtaining appropriate clinical
documentation.
(b) A managed care organization shall make all concurrent review
determinations within one calendar day of obtaining the appropriate clinical
documentation.
(c) A managed care organization shall make all Community Psychiatric
Support and Treatment services and Psychosocial Rehabilitation Services
authorizations within seven calendar days of obtaining appropriate clinical
documentation.
(d) A managed care organization shall make all determinations for any
behavioral health crisis services that require prior authorization as expeditiously as
the enrollee's condition requires, but no later than one calendar day after obtaining
appropriate clinical documentation.
(2) The standard service authorization determination may be extended up to
an additional seven calendar days if either of the following conditions are met:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 915 ENROLLED
(a) The enrollee or the health care provider requests an extension.
(b) The managed care organization justifies to the Louisiana Department of
Health, upon request, a need for additional information and how the extension is in
the enrollee's best interest.
E.(1) In the event a healthcare provider indicates or the managed care
organization determines that following the standard service authorization timeframe
could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's life; health; or ability to attain, maintain, or
regain maximum function, the managed care organization shall make an expedited
authorization determination and provide notice as expeditiously as the enrollee's
health condition requires, but no later than seventy-two hours after receipt of the
request for service.
(2) The expedited authorization determination may be extended up to an
additional seven calendar days if either of the following conditions are met:
(a) The enrollee or the health care provider requests an extension.
(b) The managed care organization obtains approval for an extension from
the Louisiana Department of Health that is based upon a need for additional clinical
documentation and the extension is in the enrollee's best interest.
F. The managed care organization shall make retrospective review
determinations within thirty calendar days of obtaining the results of any appropriate
clinical documentation that may be required.
G. The managed care organization shall not subsequently retract its
authorization after services have been provided or reduce payment for an item or
service furnished in reliance upon previous service authorization approval, unless the
approval was based upon a material omission or misrepresentation about the
enrollee's health condition made by the provider.
H. If a managed care organization fails to make a determination within the
time frames set forth in this Section the managed care organization shall be
prohibited from denying the claim based upon a lack of prior authorization.
I.(1) For purposes of this Section, "appropriate clinical documentation"
includes the results of any face-to-face clinical evaluation or second opinion that
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 915 ENROLLED
may be required. If the request for utilization review from the participating provider
or facility does not include all the necessary information required by the health
insurance issuer then the health insurance issuer shall have one calendar day to
inform the provider or facility what additional information is necessary to make the
determination and shall allow a provider or facility no less than two business days
to provide the necessary information to the health insurance issuer. In cases where
the provider or an enrollee will not release necessary information the health
insurance issuer may deny certification of an admission, procedure, or service.
(2) When conducting a utilization review determination, a managed care
organization shall:
(a) Accept any evidence-based information from a provider or facility that
will assist in the authorization process.
(b) Collect only the information necessary to authorize the service and
maintain a process for the provider or facility to submit such records.
(c) If medical records are requested, require only the portion of the medical
record necessary in that specific case to determine medical necessity or
appropriateness of the service to be delivered; to include admission or extension of
stay and frequency or duration of service.
(d) Base utilization review determinations on the medical information in the
enrollee's records and obtained by the managed care organization up to the time of
the review determination.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.